Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-192
Transportation of liquor into state forbidden; when.

A person or common carrier shall not haul or transport alcoholic liquor, whether by boat, airplane, automobile, truck, or other conveyance, in or into this state, for sale, or for storage and sale in this state, upon which the required labeling or gauging fee, tax, duty, or license has not been paid. A person or common carrier shall not haul or transport alcoholic liquor, whether by boat, airplane, automobile, truck, or other conveyance, in or into this state, for personal use, unless the required labeling or gauging fee, tax, duty, or license has been paid, either in this state or the state where such alcoholic liquor was purchased.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 68, p. 410;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-368;

R.S.1943, § 53-192;

Laws 1991, LB 344, § 69;

Laws 2000, LB 973, § 8.